Utah statutes.
54-4-15.2.   Signals or devices at grade crossings -- Funds for payment of
costs.
The funds provided by the state for purposes of this act shall be used in
conjunction with other available moneys, including those received from federal
sources, to pay all or part of the cost of the installation, maintenance,
reconstruction or improvement of any signals or devices described in Section
54-4-15.1 at any grade crossing of a public highway or any road over the
tracks of any railroad or street railroad corporation in this state.
